Utah statutes.
64-13a-4.   Creation of division -- Authority of director.

There is created in the Department of Corrections the Division of Correctional Industries, which shall be under the direction of the director of correctional industries, who shall be appointed by the director of the Department of Corrections.  The director of correctional industries shall have considerable business operations experience, including the supervision and management of production operations, and has the authority to:

(1)  determine the personnel needs and requirements of the program;

(2)  hire all subordinate personnel in accordance with state policy and procedures; and

(3)  market and deliver correctional industry products and services.

